Utah statutes.
13-40-301.   Prohibition on the use of software.
A person who is not an owner or operator of a computer may not cause computer
software to be copied on the computer knowingly, with conscious avoidance of
actual knowledge, or willfully, if the software is used to:
(1)  modify, through intentionally deceptive means, settings of a computer
controlling:
(a)  the webpage that appears when an owner or operator launches an Internet
browser or similar computer software used to access and navigate the Internet;
(b)  the default provider or web proxy that an owner or operator uses to
access or search the Internet; or
(c)  an owner's or an operator's list of bookmarks used to access webpages;
(2)  collect, through intentionally deceptive means, personally identifiable
information:
(a)  through the use of a keystroke-logging function that records all or
substantially all keystrokes made by an owner or operator of a computer and
transfers that information from the computer to another person;
(b)  in a manner that correlates personally identifiable information with data
concerning all or substantially all of the webpages visited by an owner or
operator, other than webpages operated by the person providing the software,
if the computer software was installed in a manner designed to conceal from
all authorized users of the computer the fact that the software is being
installed; or
(c)  by extracting from the hard drive of an owner's or an operator's
computer, an owner's or an operator's Social Security number, tax
identification number, driver license number, passport number, any other
government-issued identification number, an account balance, or overdraft
history for a purpose unrelated to any of the purposes of the software or
service described to an authorized user;
(3)  prevent, through intentionally deceptive means, an owner's or an
operator's reasonable efforts to block or disable the installation or
execution of computer software by causing computer software that the owner or
operator has properly removed or disabled to automatically reinstall or
reactivate on the computer without the authorization of an authorized user;
(4)  intentionally misrepresent that computer software will be uninstalled or
disabled by an owner's or an operator's action;
(5)  through intentionally deceptive means, remove, disable, or render
inoperative security, antispyware, or antivirus computer software installed on
an owner's or an operator's computer;
(6)  enable use of an owner's or an operator's computer to:
(a)  access or use a modem or Internet service for the purpose of causing
damage to an owner's or an operator's computer or causing an owner or
operator, or a third party affected by that conduct, to incur financial
charges for a service that the owner or operator did not authorize;
(b)  open multiple, sequential, stand-alone messages in an owner's or an
operator's computer without the authorization of an owner or operator and with
knowledge that a reasonable computer user could not close the messages without
turning off the computer or closing the software application in which the
messages appear, unless the communication originated from the computer's
operating system, a software application the user activated, or a service
provider that the user chose to use, or was presented for any of the purposes
described in Section 13-40-303; or
(c)  transmit or relay commercial electronic mail or a computer virus from the
computer, if the transmission or relay is initiated by a person other than the
authorized user without the authorization of an authorized user;
(7)  modify, without the authorization of an owner or operator, any of the
following settings related the computer's access to, or use of, the Internet:
(a)  settings that protect information about an owner or operator for the
purpose of taking personally identifiable information of the owner or
operator;
(b)  security settings, for the purpose of causing damage to a computer; or
(c)  settings that protect the computer from the uses identified in Subsection
(6); or
(8)  prevent, without the authorization of an owner or operator, an owner's or
an operator's reasonable efforts to block the installation of, or to disable,
computer software by:
(a)  presenting the owner or operator with an option to decline installation
of computer software with knowledge that, when the option is selected by the
authorized user, the installation nevertheless proceeds;
(b)  falsely representing that computer software has been disabled;
(c)  requiring in an intentionally deceptive manner the user to access the
Internet to remove the software with knowledge or reckless disregard of the
fact that the software frequently operates in a manner that prevents the user
from accessing the Internet;
(d)  changing the name, location, or other designation information of the
software for the purpose of preventing an authorized user from locating the
software to remove it;
(e)  using randomized or intentionally deceptive filenames, directory folders,
formats, or registry entries for the purpose of avoiding detection and removal
of the software by an authorized user;
(f)  causing the installation of software in a particular computer directory
or in computer memory for the purpose of evading an authorized user's attempt
to remove the software from the computer; or
(g)  requiring, without the authority of the owner of the computer, that an
authorized user obtain a special code or download software from a third party
to uninstall the software.
